Maryland, session 2025, HB0961.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Finance and Procurement
13–228.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “STATE PUBLIC ART” MEANS PUBLIC ART
COMMISSIONED FOR A PROJECT THAT RECEIVES STATE FUNDING, REGARDLESS OF
WHETHER THE STATE FUNDING DIRECTLY PAID FOR THE PUBLIC ART.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *hb0961*

HOUSE BILL 961
(B) (1) AN ENTITY MAY NOT INCLUDE IN A CONTRACT FOR STATE PUBLIC
ART A REQUIREMENT THAT AN ARTIST WAIVE COPYRIGHT PROTECTIONS OR RIGHTS
UNDER 17 U.S.C. § 106A.
(2) NOTWITHSTANDING PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION, AN
ARTIST MAY CHOOSE TO WAIVE THEIR COPYRIGHT PROTECTIONS OR RIGHTS UNDER
17 U.S.C. § 106A IN A CONTRACT FOR STATE PUBLIC ART.
(C) A COURT MAY NOT ENFORCE A WAIVER DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (B)
(B)(1) OF THIS SECTION THAT IS INCLUDED IN A CONTRACT ENTERED INTO BEFORE
OCTOBER 1, 2025.
(D) AN ENTITY THAT COMMISSIONS STATE PUBLIC ART SHALL REGISTER
THE ART WITH THE MARYLAND STATE ARTS COUNCIL, INCLUDING:
(1) THE NAME AND CONTACT INFORMATION OF THE ARTIST;
(2) THE LOCATION OF THE ART;
(3) THE TYPE OF ART;
(4) THE TITLE OF THE ART; AND
(5) THE DATE OF INSTALLATION OR CREATION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.